Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-249
Pupils; health inspections; rules;
duties of Department of Health and Human Services; compliance with Medication
Aide Act; when.

The Department of Health and Human
Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for conducting school
health inspections, the qualifications of the person or persons authorized
to make such inspections, and the health conditions to be observed and remedied
and shall furnish to school authorities the
rules and regulations and other useful materials for carrying
out the purposes of sections 79-248 to 79-253. The department may make available to schools methods for
the gathering, analysis, and sharing of school health data that do not violate
any privacy laws.

On and after July 1, 1999, no staff member of any school shall
administer medication unless the school complies with the applicable requirements
of the Medication Aide Act. Notwithstanding any other provision, nothing in
the act shall be construed to require any school to employ or use a school
nurse or medication aide in order to be in compliance with the act.

Laws 1919, c. 241, § 2, p. 1004;

C.S.1922, § 6537;

C.S.1929, § 79-2114;

R.S.1943, § 79-2123;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 172, p. 749;

Laws 1967, c. 538, § 2, p. 1778;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,134;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 53;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 816;

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 43;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 711;

Laws 2010, LB713, § 2.

Medication Aide Act, see section 71-6718.